Arkansas, session 2025, HB1135.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Purpose and legislative intent.
(a) Acts 2023, No. 261:
(1) Amended Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, by
adding an additional section that provided for the issuance of an application
for a digitized driver's license;
(2) Was signed into law by the Governor on March 13, 2023; and
(3) Is effective on and after February 1, 2025.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly by enactment of this act
to amend Arkansas Code § 27-16-817, as enacted by Acts 2023, No. 261, § 4,
to:
(1) Include the issuance of an application for a digitized state
*ZRC023*
01/09/2025 3:44:14 PM ZRC023

HB1135
identification card;
(2) Authorize the Office of Driver Services to collect a fee,
the exact amount of which may be determined at the discretion of the Office
of Driver Services but shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per digitized
driver's license or digitized identification card issued; and
(3) Set forth the revisions to the language enacted by Act 2023,
No. 261, § 4, as provided in Section 2 of this act.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-16-817, as enacted by Acts 2023, No.
261, § 4, and effective on and after February 1, 2025, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Current status” means the record maintained by the Office
of Driver Services reflecting a driver's license or identification card
holder's present status, including without limitation whether the driver's
license or identification card is:
(A) Valid;
(B) Expired;
(C) Cancelled;
(D) Suspended;
(E) Disqualified;
(F) A special restricted license; or
(G) Held by a driver required to use an ignition interlock
device;
(2) “Digitized driver's license” means a data file:
(A) Available on a mobile device which has connectivity to
the internet through an application that allows the mobile device to download
the data file from the Office of Driver Services or its authorized
representative;
(B) Containing all of the same data elements visible on
the face and back of the driver's license; and
(C) Displays Displaying the current status of the driver's
license;
(3) "Digitized identification card" means a data file:
(A) Available on a mobile device that has connectivity to
the internet through an application that allows the mobile device to download
01/09/2025 3:44:14 PM ZRC023

HB1135
the data file from the Office of Driver Services or its authorized
representative;
(B) Containing all of the same data elements visible on
the face and back of the identification card issued by the Office of Driver
Services pursuant to § 27-16-805; and
(C) Displaying the current status of the identification
card;
(4) “Private entity” means a natural person, corporation,
general partnership, limited liability corporation, limited partnership,
joint venture, business trust, public benefit corporation, nonprofit entity,
and other business entity; and
(4)(5) “Public entity” means an agency or instrumentality of the
state, including without limitation a department, an institution of higher
education, a board, or a commission.
(b)(1) The Office of Driver Services shall offer an additional option
to view a digitized driver's license upon payment of ten dollars ($10.00) or
digitized identification card to an applicant:
(A) With a valid Arkansas driver's license or Arkansas
identification card; or
(B) Renewing his or her Arkansas driver's license or
Arkansas identification card.
(2) The digitized driver's license or digitized identification
card shall be available for view at any time until the expiration of the
applicant's Arkansas driver's license issued under § 27-16-801(a)(1) or
Arkansas identification card issued under § 27-16-805.
(3) The Office of Driver Services may charge the holder of a
driver's license or an identification card a fee of no more than ten dollars
($10.00) before providing the option to view a digitized driver's license or
digitized identification card.
(3)(4) The fee for the option to view a digitized driver's
license or digitized identification card required authorized under
subdivision (b)(1)(3) of this section is in addition to any other fees
charged by the Office of Driver Services for the issuance of an Arkansas
driver's license or Arkansas identification card.
(c) A digital copy, photograph, or image of a driver's license or
identification card which is not downloaded through the application on a
01/09/2025 3:44:14 PM ZRC023

HB1135
mobile device shall not be a valid digitized driver's license or digitized
identification card as provided in this section.
(d)(1) The display of a digitized driver's license or digitized
identification card shall not serve as consent or authorization for a law
enforcement officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any
other data or application on the mobile device.
(2) If a person presents their his or her mobile device to a law
enforcement officer for purposes of displaying the person's digitized
driver's license or digitized identification card, the law enforcement
officer shall promptly return the mobile device to the person once the law
enforcement officer has had an opportunity to verify the identity and license
status of the person.
(3) A law that requires a person to surrender his or her
Arkansas driver's license or Arkansas identification card to a law
enforcement officer shall not apply to the mobile device used to display his
or her digitized driver's license or digitized identification card.
(e) A digitized driver's license or digitized identification card,
except as provided in § 27-16-805(e)(2)(A):
(1) May be accepted by a public entity for all state purposes
authorized for a driver's license or identification card; and
(2) May be accepted by a private entity for all state purposes
for a driver's license or identification card.
(f) The fees collected under subsection (b) this section shall be
deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Central Services
Fund as direct revenue to be used by the Revenue Division of the Department
of Finance and Administration to defray the cost of administering a digitized
driver's license or digitized identification card and for other related
purposes as required by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties of the
division.
(g) The Department of Finance and Administration may promulgate rules
for the implementation of this section.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Acts 2023, No. 261, § 4,
amended Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 16, Subchapter 8, by adding an
01/09/2025 3:44:14 PM ZRC023

HB1135
additional section that provided for the issuance of an application for a
digitized driver's license; that Acts 2023, No. 261 is effective on February
1, 2025; that Acts 2023, No. 261 did not provide for the issuance of an
application for a digitized identification card; that not all Arkansans have
a driver's license; that Acts 2023, No. 261, § 4, created a mandatory ten-
dollar fee for the issuance of a digitized driver's license; and that this
act is immediately necessary because it is within the interest of the General
Assembly to provide Arkansas citizens access to a digitized driver's license
or digitized identification card at the least possible cost, as determined by
the Office of Driver Services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.


















01/09/2025 3:44:14 PM ZRC023